North Dakota, session 69, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 44-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Secretary of state - Petition records - Exempt.
A record received by the secretary of state, which is related to a request for approval of a petition to
initiate or refer a measure, is an exempt record until the secretary of state has passed upon the
sufficiency of the petition under section 16.1 - 01 - 10, or thirty - five days have passed since the secretary
of state received the record, whichever occurs first.

H. B. NO. 1158 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1158.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State